Florida, session 2026, SB22.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 61 62 Section 1.âThe facts stated in the preamble to this act are 63 found and declared to be true. 64 Section 2.âThe sum of $28 million is appropriated from the 65 General Revenue Fund to the Department of Children and Families 66 for the relief of L.P. for injuries and damages sustained. 67 Section 3.âThe Chief Financial Officer is directed to draw 68 a warrant in the sum of $28 million payable to a special needs 69 trust created for the exclusive use and benefit of L.P. for 70 injuries and damages sustained. 71 Section 4.âThe amount paid by the Department of Children 72 and Families pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the 73 amount awarded under this act are intended to provide the sole 74 compensation for all present and future claims arising out of 75 the factual situation described in this act which resulted in 76 injuries and damages to L.P. The total amount paid for attorney 77 fees, lobbying fees, and other similar expenses relating to this 78 claim may not exceed 25 percent of the total amount awarded 79 under this act. 80 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.